New Mexico, session 2026, HB192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] PROHIBITED TRANSACTIONS.--Prior to July 1, 2036, a foreign corporation, including an in-state subsidiary of a foreign corporation, shall not purchase a single-family residential property for the purpose of making the single-family residential property an investment rental property in the state. As used in this section, "foreign corporation" means a corporation that is organized under the laws of another state or a foreign country. .233144.2